• Fleming Christopher Paul MD • Cary • North Carolina • eyesurgeonsmd.com                      USA   Laser Vision Correction  LoginRegisterLogin with Facebook         F Fleming Christopher Paul MD    Not evaluated yet  Evaluate     400 Ashville Ave Suite 300, Cary, North Carolina    About Us How to get     FLEMING CHRISTOPHER PAUL MD | Cary  |  Add to My list Added        Companies  Products      Search companies…  







  Edit Fleming Christopher Paul MD   See phone loading...  (919) 233-2020    400 Ashville Ave Suite 300   Cary, North Carolina  How to get   http://www.eyesurgeonsmd.com   Laser Vision Correction Laser Vision CorrectionGlasses       







  Top Businesses         Dr David Hazan DMD       Lewis Orthopaedics       Valley Dental       Dentist Mission Viejo       OrthoTexas   







   Evaluations of Fleming Christopher Paul MD:        To evaluate this company please Login or Register    Statistics:6times viewed7times listed   Keywords: Health & Medicine, Vision & Eye Care, Laser Vision Correction, Laser Vision Correction, Glasses, Glass, Fleming Christopher Paul MD, Cary, Health & Medicine Cary, Vision & Eye Care Cary, Laser Vision Correction Cary, Laser Vision Correction Cary, Glasses Cary, Glass Cary, Fleming Christopher Paul MD Cary, Cary Cary Fleming Christopher Paul MD - Cary - North Carolina - eyesurgeonsmd.com    400 Ashville Ave Suite 300Show on map   How to get   







id0310005147021 Related Content for: Fleming Christopher Paul MD    Jacqueline Fleming | Public Records | PublicRecords.com Searching for Jacqueline Fleming? We have records for this person. Here are possible matches in our databases for Jacqueline Fleming. Check phone, address, background ...      Susan L Fleming | Public Records | PublicRecords.com Searching for Susan Fleming? We have records for this person. Here are possible matches in our databases for Susan L Fleming. Check phone, address, background ...      Faculty - MD Anderson Cancer Center Welcome to M. D. Anderson's Faculty Profile page! Search our database for faculty members who have online biographies and CVs. You can search in two ways:      Descendants of Benjamin Fleming - Part 6 Descendants of David Fleming thru his son Benjamin Fleming of Pitt County, North Carolina. Sixth of eight parts      Doctors by Last Name (F): Dr. Fleming, Philip – Dr ... Over two million free patient reviews. Compare & find doctors. Examine doctors with two billion data elements.      Paul Christo NIDA Addiction Performance Project Dr. Christo an expert Panelist for “The Addiction Performance Project”, National Institute on Drug Abuse, Washington, D.C ...      Fleming Family Genealogy Forum (All Messages) - GenForum - Home Return to Main Page | Page Listings. Charity or Christine Fleming? - Karen Romick 7/08/12. Re:Fleming Family/olive hill,ky/grayson,ky - lillian fleming 7/06/12      Tennessee Doctors & Physicians - Rate / Find A MD in Tennesse ... Tennessee Doctors & Physicians - Rate / Find A MD in Tennesse :: DrScore. Score doctors in Tennessee. DrScore.com, a revolutionary method to enable and empower ...      Maryland Republican Party - National Convention Delegates REPUBLICAN PARTY NATIONAL CONVENTION, TAMPA, FLORIDA, AUGUST 27-30, 2012. DELEGATES ELECTED BY VOTERS AT PRIMARY ELECTION, APRIL 3, 2012. 1st Congressional District ...      Paul Kramer - Background Check, People Search, Find out ... Find out everything about Paul Kramer, Background Check, Phone numbers, People Search, Social Networks, Photos      Missouri Doctors & Physicians - Rate / Find A MD in Missouri ... Missouri Doctors & Physicians - Rate / Find A MD in Missouri :: DrScore. Score doctors in Missouri. DrScore.com, a revolutionary method to enable and empower patients ...      Pledge Life Memorial Raegan Summer Pratt, 22, was born July 20, 1989, in beautiful Newport Beach to Larry and Tracey Pratt. She received a new kidney six years ago and fought rejection ...      Gastrointestinal Center - Doctors & Staff - MD Anderson ... Our Publications. Keep up with the latest in cancer treatment, research, education and prevention. Subscribe      Random House - Bringing you the best in fiction, nonfiction ... Random House, Inc., the world's largest English language trade publisher, bringing you the best in fiction, nonfiction, and children's books.      IMDb: Advanced Title Search IMDb's advanced search allows you to run extremely powerful queries over all people and titles in the database. Find exactly what you're looking for!      AUA2012 Annual Meeting Please use the search options below to access AUA2012 accepted Abstracts.      Topic Galleries -- baltimoresun.com - The Baltimore Sun ... Topic galleries provide easy access to stories and photos about people, places, organizations, events and subjects of interest to you. They bring together rich ...      Frederick County, MD Genealogy Forum (All Messages) Return to Main Page | Page Listings. Sebastian Han, Frederick Co. MD 1766 - Vickie Elam White 5/22/12 **Catherine Richter/Henry Darst(Durst)** - Debbie S. 4/20/12      Natural Resources, Maryland Department of Joseph P. Gill, Deputy Secretary (410) 260-8102 Frank W. Dawson III, Assistant Secretary, Aquatic Resources (410) 260-8110 Kristin Saunders Evans, Assistant Secretary ...      Bowie High School Class Of 1981, Bowie, MD - MISSING CLASSMATES - Know the email address of a missing Classmate? Enter it below and an invite to our site will automatically be sent.     Fleming Christopher Paul MD400 Ashville Ave Suite 300CaryNorth Carolina(919) 233-2020http://www.eyesurgeonsmd.com     About TuugoToSPrivacy PolicyFAQMobileTranslate TuugoSite MapBlog0.159856081008913Copyright 2009 - 2017 Tuugo  


    


Christopher D Fleming - Westminster, MD | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Christopher D Fleming in Westminster, MD


Christopher D Fleming

                                                                           Intelius found that Christopher D Fleming  is  a male between 40 and 40 years old from Westminster, MD.  We have connected them to
                11 addresses,
                3 phones,
                and 4 relatives or associates.
         





Also Known As

Chris T Fleming


Get Report Now

Age

Christopher D Fleming is in his 40s

Christopher Has Lived In

Westminster, MD
Bethesda, MD
Taneytown, MD

Christopher's Relatives

Tammy Deavers
Virginia Fleming
Marion Fleming
David Fleming







Christopher D Fleming



Zodiac SignVirgo



GenderMale



Professional Status
Technical Product Management Analyst Senior Staff at Lockheed Martin Corporation



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Christopher? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Christopher, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Christopher D Fleming
Get a Criminal Check on Christopher D Fleming
Get a Public Record Report on Christopher D Fleming
Get a People Search Report on Christopher D Fleming


Christopher D Fleming's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Christopher D Fleming has lived as well as Christopher D Fleming's phone numbers and email addresses.




Christopher D Fleming Has Lived in 3 States
Maryland Address for Christopher D Fleming


5 B******* R* 

Westminster, MD


Has Lived In

Westminster, MD
Bethesda, MD


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Christopher D Fleming

(410) ***-**** - Westminster, MD 
(410) ***-**** - Westminster, MD 
() ***-**** - Manchester, MD 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Christopher D Fleming

m**********r@***.com
f******c@***.com
f******c@***.com


Get Email Report




Christopher D Fleming's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Christopher D Fleming's academic history.  Find out which schools Christopher D Fleming attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Christopher D Fleming received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Christopher D Fleming Has Attended 1 School
Westminster High School 1991 – 1995                              


Christopher D Fleming's Professional Information
Information regarding Christopher D Fleming's professional history.  Find out previous places Christopher D Fleming has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Christopher D Fleming Has Worked at 1 Place
Company: Lockheed Martin Corporation
               Title: Technical Product Management Analyst Senior Staff
Christopher D Fleming's Experience
Title: Technical Product Management Analyst Senior Staff
               Company: Lockheed Martin Corporation
Job Details
               Lockheed Martin Corporation (LM), headquartered in Bethesda, Md., is a global security and aerospace company that employs about 113,000 people worldwide and is principally engaged in the research, design, development, manufacture, integration and sustainment of advanced technology systems, products and services. The Corporationâ€™s net sales for 2013 were $45.4 billion.
Additional Professional Information on Christopher D Fleming

 See Christopher D Fleming's LinkedIn Profile



Christopher D Fleming's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Christopher D Fleming


Christopher D Fleming's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Christopher D Fleming's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Christopher Fleming
Username Matches

                  ChristopherFleming
                  FlemingChristopher
                  Christopher.Fleming
                  Fleming.Christopher
                  Christopher_Fleming
                  Fleming_Christopher
                  Christopher-Fleming
                  Fleming-Christopher
                  CFleming
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
C Fleming







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.















FLEMING CHRISTOPHER MD Brunswick MD, 21716 - Cortera Company Profile
















cortera. business directory



Create
								Account
Login
Developers





Search Cortera for a Business









State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming














Home
Business
							Directory
Health Services
Fleming Christopher MD
Cortera Support: 866-589-0664







Fleming Christopher MD



610 9th Ave

Brunswick,
							
							
							 MD
							
							
							 21716-1828
							
							 |  view map


(301) 834-7188

						Looking for more information? Sign
							up for FREE!







Company Overview

FLEMING CHRISTOPHER MD is in the Offices and Clinics of Doctors of Medicine industry in Brunswick, MD.  













Company Details

Location Type:
						Single Location
					

Industry:
						Offices and Clinics of Doctors of Medicine
					

Ownership: Private
						
					

Year Founded:
						2013
					


     
    
   
  

						Have fresher information?  Update
















Latest Company News







READ ALL COMPANY NEWS IN THE
									COMPLETE COMPANY CREDIT REPORT







Recent Company Alerts

Credit Risk Increase
No


Overall Payments
No


Peer Payments
No


Public Records
No


Financial News
No












								Alerts on more than 5,000 companies today,
								including:
							

Walbro


Southern Cleaning Service Inc


Mitchell Industrial Contractors Inc


Montgomery Marine Repair


RAM Enterprises Inc


Coats Electric CO Inc


Hammer & CO


University of Alaska Fairbanks


Barnes & Noble


Ideal Construction CO








Community Payment Ratings
















								LATEST COMMUNITY REVIEWS OF THIS COMPANY
								
							

Cortera is much more than an awesome business
									directory! It's an active community where real business people
									share the real deal on real businesses.

It's invaluable intel
										that's now available for FREE.



Get the inside scoop with ratings and reviews on Fleming Christopher MD
Rate Fleming Christopher MD on their
										payment behavior
									
Ask your network about Fleming Christopher MD
										with Cortera Circles
									


Join
										the Cortera Community for free today.
								








The information contained in this company profile is compiled from third party sources, including but not limited to public records, user submissions, and other commercially available data sources. These sources may not be accurate, complete, or up-to-date. 
Cortera makes no representations or warranties regarding, and assumes no responsibility for, the accuracy, completeness, or currency of the information contained herein. 
Cortera products are enabled by SOFIE™, our proprietary technology platform for rapid data processing, robust analytics and flexible data access.











© 2017 Cortera, Inc. All rights reserved.

Sitemap





Cortera Support: 866-589-0664 |
How Does it Work? |
Who
					Do We Help? |
Company Profiles |
Community
				|
Media
				|
About






Today's
					Hot Company Profiles

W & B TRUCKING INC
VOLATUS MAXIMUS LLC
VUDEN INC
VOLUNTEERS OF AMERICA INC
VOGT JAMES B MD
VOLTAIRE
VOORHEES ARIZONA TASTE INC
VOGUE
VORA SHAILESH C MD
VOLUME REVERSAL SURVEY

More
							Today's Hot Companies »



Recently
					Updated Companies

SPIRES PHILLIP CONSTRUCTION
CONTORNO INC
AIR CONDITIONING SEC
ADVENT I LLC
GOODY 2 SHOES
L & L MACHINE TOOL
CROSS COUNTY BANCSHARES INC
WESTERN SUN SHUTTLE INC
POWERHOUSE INDUSTRIAL SUPPLY INC
JL LOPER CONSTRUCTION

More
								Recently Updated Companies »



Recently
					Rated Company Profiles

SLT EXPRESS WAY INC
IDEAL TRUE VALUE INC
JR BALL CONTRACTING GROUP INC
STINGER WELDING INC
GLOBAL MERCHANDISING INC
PANALPINA INC
SUNSTAR HEATING & AIRE
AZURADISC
LAW OFFICES OF SUSAN M SCHAUF
MD THOMAS CONSTRUCTION LLC

More
								Recently Rated Companies »



Industry Directory




Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy





 
  
 

 

  














Companies in Health & Medicine, Vision & Eye Care, Laser Vision Correction USA               Companies in Health & Medicine, Vision & Eye Care, Laser Vision Correction USA LoginRegisterLogin with Facebook www.tuugo.us    Companies  Products      Hotels, New York    Search in:  Laser Vision Correction          CompaniesProducts +Publish for free Promote your Ad   Home   Health & Medicine 














Agriculture, Fishing & Forestry
(53,781)


Apparel & Accessories
(57,825)


Art, Entertainment & Media
(71,608)


Automotive
(69,372)


Construction & Renovation
(113,175)


Education
(82,321)


Family & Community
(35,325)


Finance & Legal
(133,889)


Food & Beverages
(42,201)


Health & Medicine
(122,490)


Home & Garden
(154,263)


Industrial Supplies & Services
(68,844)


Personal Care
(41,020)


Public utilities & Environment
(11,606)


Real Estate & Insurance
(110,494)


Shopping & Speciality Stores
(35,370)


Sports & Recreation
(28,637)


Technology
(54,980)


Transportation
(126,173)


Travel & Lodging
(28,204)




   Vision & Eye Care 














Alternative Health Care
(14,524)


Associations & Organizations
(281)


Dental Care
(12,548)


Diet and Nutrition
(1,329)


Doctors and Health Specialists
(6,225)


Fitness and Exercise
(4,105)


Health services
(7,081)


Hospital & Clinics
(8,726)


Long term Care
(4,643)


Medical Products Equipment
(36,795)


Physicians and Surgeons
(12,074)


Therapy & Counselling
(5,250)


Vision & Eye Care
(7,569)




   Laser Vision Correction 














Contact Lenses
(272)


Eye Care
(499)


Eyeglasses & Eyewear
(858)


Laser Vision Correction
(132)


Lasers
(15)


Ocularists
(19)


Optical Laboratories
(3)


Optical Products
(47)


Opticians
(982)


Optometrists
(4,784)




     Sort byBest RatedMost recentDistance Filtered By Health & Medicinex Vision & Eye Carex Laser Vision Correctionx  By State  Alabama  Alaska  Arizona  California  Colorado  Connecticut  Delaware  Florida  Georgia  Hawaii  Illinois  Iowa  Louisiana  Massachusetts  Nebraska  Nevada  New Hampshire  New Jersey  New York  North Carolina  Ohio  Oklahoma  Pennsylvania  Texas  Utah  Virginia  Washington  Wyoming   







 







        Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Florida Vision Institute     1515 N. Flagler Dr.Suite 500 | 33401 West Palm Beach     -  Florida     See phone loading...  (561) 659-9700      See fax loading... (561) 659-7153         Contact         Ophthalmologist, Ophthalmology, Cataracts, eye doctor, Lasik Eye Surgery, Lasik, Laser Eye Surgery, Eye Surgery           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Monterey County Eye Associates     1441 Constitution Blvd, Bldg 400, Ste 100 | 93906 Salinas     -  California     See phone loading...  (831) 424-1150             Contact         Comprehensive Eye Care, Ophthalmology, Glaucoma Surgery, Cataracts Surgery, Diabetic Retinopathy, Eye Care, Eye Care Center, Laser Vision Correction           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Lifetime Eye Care     6060 Rockside Woods Blvd N Ste 110 | 44131 Independence     -  Ohio     See phone loading...  (216) 581-8484             Contact         Ophthalmologist, Lasik Surgeon, Eye Care Center, cataract surgery, Contact Lenses, Comprehensive Eye Care, Eye Exams, Eye Care           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Primary Eye Care Associates     5460 S Archer Ave | 60638 Chicago     -  Illinois     See phone loading...  (773) 735-6090             Contact         Ophthalmologist, Eye Care, Eye Care Center, Lasik Surgery, Lasik Surgeon, Laser Vision Correction, optometrist, Comprehensive Eye Care           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Key-Whitman Eye Center     3060 Communications Parkway, Suite 205 | 75093 Plano     -  Texas     See phone loading...  9727692020             Contact         Lasik, Comprehensive Eye Care, Eye Care Center, Eye Care, Eye Exams, Ophthalmologist, Lasik Surgeon, Vision Center           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Key-Whitman Eye Center     400 W. Arbrook Blvd. Suite 121 | 76014 Arlington     -  Texas     See phone loading...  8176350201             Contact         Lasik Surgery, Comprehensive Eye Care, Contact Lenses, Eye Care, Eye Care Center, Eye Exams, Eye Surgery, cataract surgery           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Edward L Boshnick     7800 SW 87 Ave Suite B-270 | 33173 Miami     -  Florida     See phone loading...  305-271-8206             Contact         Corneal Topography Miami, Keratoconus, Corneal Transplant, Dry Eye Symptoms, Optical Coherence Tomography, Vitreous Floaters, Eye Symptoms, Cornea Transplant           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Griffey Eye Care & Laser Center     560 Kempsville Road, Suite 100 | 23320 Chesapeake     -  Virginia     See phone loading...  757-410-9500             Contact         Eye Clinic, Cataracts, Contact Lenses, Eye Care, Eye Care Center, Eye Doctors, Ophthalmology, Optometry           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Campus Eye Group     1700 Whitehorse-Hamilton Square Road, Suite A-1 | 8690 Hamilton     -  New Jersey     See phone loading...  (609) 587-2020      See mobile loading... (609) 587-2020      See fax loading... (609) 588-9545     Contact         optometrist, Ophthalmologist, Optical, Eyewear, Laser Vision Correction, Lasik, eye doctor, eye surgury           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Fedvp | Federal Dental and Vision Plan     Address; 23901 Calabasas Road Suite 2014 | 91302 Calabasas     -  California     See phone loading...  +818-223-9750             Contact         Dental Insurance Plan, ppo dental plans california, Fedvp, federal dental plan, federal dental plans, Federal Employees, benefeds, fedvip           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      The Refractive Laser Specialists of New York     166 E 63rd St | 10065 New York     -  New York     See phone loading...  (212) 753-8300             Contact         Eye Care, Eye Surgery, Ophthalmologist, Lasik Surgery           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Bucci Laser Vision     158 Wilkes Barre Township Blvd, PA | 18702 Wilkes-Barre     -  Pennsylvania     See phone loading...  (570) 825-5949             Contact         LASIK Wilkes-Barre PA, Cataracts, Lasik Surgeon, Dry Eye treatments, Lasik Surgery, Cataract Surgeries, Premium IOLs, Ophthalmologist           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Clear Choice Custom LASIK Center     7001 S Edgerton Rd Suite D, OH | 44141 Brecksville     -  Ohio     See phone loading...  (440) 740-0400             Contact         LASIK Brecksville OH, LASIK Akron OH, LASIK Surgery Cleveland OH, Laser Vision Correction, Eye Care, Lasik Doctor, Eye Surgery, Eye Surgeon      b     Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      barry Wasserman, M.D     100 Canal Pointe Boulevard Suite 112 | 08540 Princeton     -  New Jersey     See phone loading...  (609) 243-8711             Contact         Lasik Eye Surgery, Eye Care Specialists, Eye Lift Surgery, children eye care      M     Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      McMann Eye Institute     91-2139 Fort Weaver Rd #202 | 96706 Ewa Beach     -  Hawaii     See phone loading...  (808) 677-2733             Contact         Lasik Surgeon, Eye Care Center, Ophthalmologist, optometrist           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Chicago Cornea Consultants LTD     1725 W Harrison St Ste 928 | 60612 Chicago     -  Illinois     See phone loading...  (312) 942-5300             Contact         Lasik Chicago, Laser Vision Correction Chicag, Cataracts Chicago, Cataract Surgery Chicago, Cornea Surgery Chicago           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Washington DC Lasik by BostonLaser     1717 Pennsylvania Ave NW #1025, | 20006 Deer Harbor     -  Washington     See phone loading...  (844) 865-2737             Contact         LASIK Center, Cataract Center, Retina Center, Cornea Center, Cosmetic Center, Order Contact Lenses, optometrist, eye doctor      M     Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Midwest Eye Care PC     4353 Dodge St. | 68131 Omaha     -  Nebraska     See phone loading...  4025522020             Contact         Eye Care, Lasik           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      North Suburban Eye Associates, P.C.     83 Herrick St. | 01915 Beverly     -  Massachusetts     See phone loading...  978-922-4003      See fax loading... 781-246-3932         Contact         Ophthalmology, Laser Vision Correction, Lasik, cataract, Eye Surgery           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Eye Physicians of Austin     5011 Burnet Rd | 78756 Austin     -  Texas     See phone loading...  (512) 583-2020      See fax loading... (512) 744-2020         Contact         Lasik Surgery, Laser Eye Surgery, Emergency eye care, Eyelid Surgery, Glaucoma Treatment, Dry Eye Treatment, allergy eye treatment, Eye Glasses      C     Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added    Inaccurate result?   Christensen David Od     510 10th St SE. | 52403 Cedar Rapids     -  Iowa     See phone loading...  319 365 2868      See fax loading... 319 377 2967           Bifocals, Cataracts, Clinic Staff, Contact Lenses, Diabetes, Disposable Contact Lenses, Dry Eyes, Eye Care      C     Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added    Inaccurate result?   Christensen David Od     1065 E. Post Rd | 52302 Marion     -  Iowa     See phone loading...  319 377 2222      See fax loading... 319 377 2967           Bifocals, Cataracts, Clinic Staff, Contact Lenses, Diabetes, Disposable Contact Lenses, Dry Eyes, Eye Care      C     Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added    Inaccurate result?   Christensen David     915 Robins Square Dr | 52328 Robins     -  Iowa     See phone loading...  319 294 8888      See fax loading... 319 377 2967           Bifocals, Cataracts, Clinic Staff, Contact Lenses, Diabetes, Disposable Contact Lenses, Dry Eyes, Eye Care           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added    Inaccurate result?   Asheville Eye Associates     166 Holly Springs Park Dr | 28734 East Franklin     -  North Carolina     See phone loading...  828 349 1539               Age Related Macular Degeneration, Blepharoplasty, Botox, Botox Surgery, cataract, Diabetic Retinopathy, Doctor, Exams           Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added    Inaccurate result?   Asheville Eye     2311 Asheville Highway | 28791 Hendersonville     -  North Carolina     See phone loading...  828233 2396               Age Related Macular Degeneration, Blepharoplasty, Botox, Botox Surgery, cataract, Diabetic Retinopathy, Doctor, Exams  







  123456 Next       Companies  Products      Hotels, New York    Search in:  Laser Vision Correction      About TuugoToSPrivacy PolicyFAQMobileTranslate TuugoSite MapBlogTuugo Language:  AfrikaansBahasa IndonesiaBahasa MelayuDanskDeutschEnglishEspañolFrançaisItalianoMagyarNederlandsPolskiPortuguêsRomânăSvenskaTiếng ViệtČeštinaΕλληνικάРусскийУкраїнськаภาษาไทย中文 (简写)日本語한국말 0.158327102661134 Copyright 2009 - 2017 Tuugo 


    



Christopher Hitchens on Fleming and Bond | Artistic Licence Renewed









































































Artistic Licence Renewed
The Literary James Bond Magazine










Christopher Hitchens on Fleming and Bond

009 / August 3, 2013 


The late Christopher Hitchens was one of Britain’s most revered, influential, antagonistic, polarizing, brilliant, erudite, eloquent, intelligent and entertaining writers. If you have not read any of his books and articles or watched him speak interviews and discussions, then it’s time you started. Much like his comrade the late, great Kingsley Amis, Hitchens was a Bond fan of the literary variety of course.
Ian Fleming had always struggled in some circles to be taken seriously as a writer and various writers have come to his defense throughout the years including Kingsley Amis, Raymond Chandler and Christopher Hitchens to name but a few.
Enjoy these quotes from Hitch, of which many were taken from Hitchen’s article ‘Bottoms Up’ for The Atlantic in April, 2006:
On Ian Fleming:
By some latent intuition, Fleming was able to peer beyond the Cold War limitations of mere spy fiction and to anticipate the emerging milieu of the Colombian cartels, Osama Bin Laden and indeed the Russian Mafia.
If Fleming had not been quite a heavy sadist and narcissist and all-around repressed pervert, we might never have got to know Rosa Klebb or Auric Goldfinger or Ernst Stavro Blofeld. And, having said that Bond was originally a figure designed to hold up the British end of the “special relationship,” I ought to add that the cleverness of the series lay partly in how it saw past the confines of the Cold War.
On the James Bond Novels:

Licence to Hitchslap
It was Fleming who first conjured it and who reached beyond the KGB into our world of the Colombian cartel, the Russian mafia, and other “non-state actors” like al-Qaeda. “SPECTRE,” I noticed recently, is an anagram of “Respect,” the name of a small British party led by a power-drunk micro-megalomaniac called George Galloway, a man with a friendly connection to Saddam Hussein.”
“Fleming once confessed that he hoped to “take the story along so fast that nobody would notice the idiosyncrasies.” Fat chance. His “idiosyncrasies” jut out like Tatiana Romanova’s ass. What he ought to have said was that he hoped to pile on the pace and thereby hustle the reader past the point where belief has to be suspended. 
The smaller details, of products and appurtenances and accessories, fulfill the function of the conjuror’s other hand. They distract attention from the glaring lacunae in the plots, the amazing stupidity of the supposedly mastermind villains, and the reckless disregard for his own safety that this supposedly ice-cold agent displays by falling for every lure.
On Bond’s Drinking:
What is James Bond really doing when he specifies the kind of Martini he wants and how he wants it? He is telling the bartender that he knows what he is talking about and is not to be messed around
On ‘From Russia With Love’:
James Bond does not make an appearance until Part Two of what is perhaps his most polished adventure, From Russia With Love. And when he has been briefed by ‘M’ and outfitted by ‘Q’, and told what is expected of him, he suffers a mid-life crisis. What, he asks as the plane takes him towards the Golden Horn, would his younger self think of the man now so ‘tarnished with years of treachery and ruthlessness and fear,’ sent off ‘to pimp for England’?” Eventually dismissing this as an idle of feeble mood, he reflects further:

On Bond and Britain:
When Fleming started to publish his stories, Britain was only just emerging from a long period of postwar austerity and uniformity, and it was beginning to be possible to emphasize luxury and style again without having a bad conscience. This development was somewhat identified with the return of the British Conservatives to power, and helped enable Fleming to be more frankly Churchillian and pro-imperial than would have been possible a few years previously.
On James Bond and America:
 The central paradox of the classic Bond stories is that, although superficially devoted to the Anglo-American war against communism, they are full of contempt and resentment for America and Americans
Today, however, I can be virtually certain that most Americans below a certain age know of Fleming solely, or chiefly, through the movies. It is under this guise only that the product has been bonded for universal export.
The second element, namely a distinctive blend of fine leather, good tailoring, and club-land confidence, was of huge importance in appealing to American Anglophilia—perhaps most especially the sort of Anglophilia that had led the United States to clone the Office of Strategic Services, and later the CIA, from the British MI5 and MI6.
The central paradox of the classic Bond stories is that, although superficially devoted to the Anglo-American war against communism, they are full of contempt and resentment for America and Americans. And not just political contempt, or the penis envy of a declining power for a burgeoning one, but cultural contempt as well. And not just with cultural contempt in general, but more specifically disgust about America’s plebeian interest in sex and consumerism, the two Bond staples. “Baseball, amusement arcades, hot dogs, hideously large bosoms, neon lighting” is how Tiger Tanaka mouths the anti-American trope in You Only Live Twice.
On Sebastian Faulks’ ‘Devil May Care’:
This pot-boiler takes several times as long as most Bond classics. There is almost no sex until the very last pages. There is almost no torture – an absolute staple of a Bond narrative – until the very last pages. Those who have a canonical attitude to Fleming will be able to collect their share of in-jokes and cross-references; wispy fragments of Vesper Lynd and Honey Ryder drift in and out of shot and memory in much the same way”. Shaky, not stirring… Fleming himself used to claim that he marched the plot along fast enough to silence all the doubts about its credibility – a guileless yet brilliant tactic. But Faulks’ takes fatally too long to smuggle his own effort past the customs. 
Except for absurd coincidences that really do stretch one’s credulity, such as Bond running into the monkey-pawed villain just before being briefed about him, everything is laboriously spelled out. Only inattention, after all, not haste, could make a writer of this stature describe a telephone call as having been put through ‘without demur’.
Incidental Intelligence
Listen to a short clip of Christopher Hitchens discussing Kingsley Amis’ ‘Book of Bond’
Read ‘Bottoms Up’ from The Atlantic Magazine
Read more of his articles from The Atlantic
Read his articles from Vanity Fair
Christopher Hitchens (1949 – 2011) was an Anglo-American author and journalist.
 

Advertisements




 


Share this:TwitterFacebookGooglePinterestLike this:Like Loading... 



Related posts





Lucky Jim Bond! – Kingsley Amis’ Mark on 007







‘Live and Let Die’ and The Birth of the Classic Bond Narrative







Top 10 Books on Ian Fleming and James Bond: Part 1






			2 thoughts on “Christopher Hitchens on Fleming and Bond”		


Pingback: Lucky Jim Bond! – Kingsley Amis’ Mark on 007 | Artistic License Renewed


Pingback: How To Make ‘The Fleming 89′ Martini | Artistic License Renewed



Comments? Cancel reply 



Enter your comment here...




Fill in your details below or click an icon to log in:



























 
 


Email (required) (Address never made public)



Name (required)



Website














 You are commenting using your WordPress.com account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Twitter account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Facebook account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Google+ account. ( Log Out / Change )




Cancel
Connecting to %s




 Notify me of new comments via email. Notify me of new posts via email.
 



 






 
Search



  Recent Posts 

Richard Hughes: Ian Fleming’s Man in the Orient


Literary 007 Tourism: Bond in Saratoga Springs


The Country Homes of Ian Fleming


Field Report: Dan Holloway


Interview with Frieda Toth


Exclusive Interview with James Fleming


Real life spies that influenced the James Bond novels


Premium Bond – The Branding in Literary James Bond


Interview with Mike Ripley, author of ‘Kiss Kiss, Bang Bang’


Ian Fleming On Screen: Inside the Making of ‘Come Before Winter’


Burgess and Bond: The Missing Diplomat Scandal’s Effect on the Early Bond Novels


The Ian Fleming Bibliography: Interview with Jon Gilbert


Mike Ripley’s ‘Kiss Kiss Bang Bang’


Made in Chelsea – Where Did Literary James Bond Really Live?


Interview with Henry Hemming, author of ‘M: Maxwell Knight, MI5’s Greatest Spymaster’


 Recent Comments 
Mark Ashby on Interview with Richard Schenkm…revelator60 on Literary 007 Tourism: Bond in…Malcolm Mcneil on Field Report: Dan HollowayGerald Wadsworth on The Country Homes of Ian Flemi…Peter Davidson on John Gardner’s ‘Li… 
Categories 
Between the Covers

Bond Continuation Authors

Book Reviews

Classified Documents

Competitions

Dust Jackets

Exclusive Interviews

Fan Art

Fan Fiction

Field Reports

Fleming 1st Editions

For Your Eyes Only

Incidental Intelligence

Intelligence News

Literary 007

Personal Bond Stories

Richard Chopping

Room 39

Seven Deadlier Sins

The Art of Bond

The Fleming Dossier

Thrilling Cities

Trompe L'oeil


 



Take Our Poll
Pre-order MI6 Confidential MagazineSubmit A Field Report 
Get the App! 
Follow on TwitterMy TweetsFollow on Facebook 

Follow on Facebook


Follow Artistic Licence Renewed on WordPress.com

Our Friends

007 Magazine
Printed publication relating to the James Bond phenomenon since 1979.
Andrew Lycett
Ian Fleming biographer and broadcaster. 
Archivo 007
The reference website about James Bond in Spanish
Bond Lifestyle
A guide to the  clothes, gadgets, vehicles and travel locations of James Bond 
Commander James Bond France
Our friends over at Station F
Fleming's Bond
A look at products, drinks, locations, cultural references made throughout the Bond series.
From Sweden with Love
One of the World’s most comprehensive websites (5000+ pages) on Ian Fleming’s James Bond. Established 2004.
Gerald Wadsworth Bond Art
A tribute in watercolour to the books and films about James Bond – originally created by Ian Fleming
Ian Fleming Publications
The official website for Ian Fleming.
Illustrated 007 – The Art of James Bond
Long time Bond collector, specialising in books and artwork
James Bond Memes
History, comment and analysis about all things Bondian from our guest contributor Edward Biddulph
Jeremy Duns
Official website of the author of the Paul Dark spy novels and new non-fiction Dead Drop
John Gardner Official
The official site of the crime author John Gardner.
Mi6 The Home of James Bond
Literary 007 – The James Bond Books & Spin-Offs
Peter Vollmer
South African Thriller Writer
Piz Gloria
Website dedicated to collecting paperback/softback novels
Queen Anne Press
Queen Anne Press publish high quality, limited edition books by Ian Fleming, Ian Flemming, James bond novels, books, Peter Fleming, Mervyn Peake
Sophie Harley Jewellery
Bespoke jewellery featured in James Bond movies ‘Casino Royale’ and ‘Quantum of Solace’.
Spy Vibe
1960s STYLE IN ACTION
The Bondologist Blog
Dedicated to the study of all aspects of Bondology.
The Book Bond
New Books. First Looks. Pure BOND.
The James Bond Dossier
News and Views on the World of 007
The Teeritz Agenda
‘Cos I had to put all this somewhere.
The Trebuchet
Home of our guest contributor Benjamin Welton
Trevor Scobie, Artist
Trevor is a professional Illustrator and also designed and painted book covers for London publishers for over 30 years.


Tags007 In New York
Andrew Lycett
ann fleming
Anthony Horowitz
Benjamin Welton
Bentley
Ben Williams
Bond Girls
Cambridge Spies
Carte Blanche
casino royale
Caspar Fleming
Charles Cumming
Christopher Hitchens
colonel sun
Denis Wirth-Miller
Diamonds Are Forever
Dr. No
edward Biddulph
Eric Ambler
Ernie Cuneo
Fergus Fleming
For Your Eyes Only
Francis Bacon
From A View To A Kill
From Russia With Love
Geoffrey Jenkins
George Almond
Gerald Wadsworth
Glidrose
goldeneye
Goldfinger
Graham Greene
Ian Fleming
Ian Fleming Publications
Ivar Bryce
jeremy duns
John Gardner
John Le Carre
John Pearson
Jon Gilbert
kingsley amis
len deighton
Live and Let Die
Matthew Parker
Michael Chance
moonraker
Noel Coward
O.F. Snelling
Octopussy
On Her Majesty's Secret Service
Per Fine Ounce
Peter Fleming
Peter Vollmer
Quantum of Solace
Raymond Benson
raymond hawkey
Revelator
Richard Chopping
Roald Dahl
SIS
SMERSH
SOE
SPECTRE
The Hildebrand Rarity
The Living Daylights
The Man With The Golden Gun
The Spy Who Loved Me
Thrilling Cities
Thunderball
Trigger Mortis
Trompe L'oeil
William Boyd
william plomer
You Only Live TwiceArchives Archives

Select Month
 July 2017  (4)
 June 2017  (6)
 May 2017  (5)
 April 2017  (7)
 March 2017  (3)
 February 2017  (5)
 January 2017  (4)
 December 2016  (5)
 November 2016  (3)
 October 2016  (5)
 September 2016  (5)
 August 2016  (5)
 July 2016  (5)
 June 2016  (4)
 May 2016  (5)
 April 2016  (6)
 March 2016  (5)
 February 2016  (4)
 January 2016  (4)
 December 2015  (6)
 November 2015  (7)
 October 2015  (5)
 September 2015  (8)
 August 2015  (8)
 July 2015  (6)
 June 2015  (4)
 May 2015  (6)
 April 2015  (10)
 March 2015  (12)
 February 2015  (6)
 January 2015  (6)
 December 2014  (5)
 November 2014  (1)
 October 2014  (5)
 September 2014  (4)
 August 2014  (10)
 July 2014  (6)
 June 2014  (5)
 May 2014  (9)
 April 2014  (10)
 March 2014  (6)
 February 2014  (9)
 January 2014  (11)
 December 2013  (16)
 November 2013  (8)
 October 2013  (12)
 September 2013  (7)
 August 2013  (6)
 July 2013  (14)
 June 2013  (18)

Disclaimer Copyright © 2015  | The James Bond novels are the property of Ian Fleming Publications Ltd. This is not an official site.
 

























Post to



Cancel







 














 
 
%d bloggers like this:









































































































































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Fleming Christopher Dpm in Ocala, FL 34474 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» Florida
» Ocala
» Podiatrists
» Fleming Christopher Dpm













Fleming Christopher Dpm


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





3300 Sw 33rd Rd  Ocala, Florida 34474


(352) 873-3332


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Fleming Christopher Dpm is located at the address 3300 Sw 33rd Rd in Ocala, Florida 34474.  They can be contacted via phone at (352) 873-3332 for pricing, hours and directions.  Fleming Christopher Dpm specializes in Hammertoe, Fractures, Callouses.  Fleming Christopher Dpm has an annual sales volume of 0 - 500K.  .For more information contact Christopher  Fleming, Fleming Christopher Dpm provides Removals, Wound Care, Shock Wave Therapy to it's customers.  For maps and directions to Fleming Christopher Dpm view the map to the right.  For reviews of Fleming Christopher Dpm see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Shoes
, Orthotic Devices
, Sandals
, Supports
, Plates



SERVICES


Removals
, Orthopedic Surgery
, Shock Wave Therapy
, Reconstructive Surgery
, Endoscopic Surgery
, Pain Management
, Wound Care
, Joint Replacement


 SPECIALTIES


Foot Disorders
, Diabetic Foot Problems
, Injuries
, Bunions
, Ingrown Toenails
, Hammertoe
, Fractures
, Callouses
, Orthotics
, Sports Injuries



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (352) 873-3332
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Main Contact First Name: Christopher
Main Contact Last Name: Fleming
Certifications: Board Certified, American Board of Podiatric Surgery
Employee Size: 5 To 9
Exact Employee Count: 5
Exact Sales Volume: 250000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 0 - 500K
Specialties: Foot Disorders
CATEGORIES:


Podiatrists
Health Care



People Also Viewed


Ocala Podiatry Center


2135 Sw 19th Avenue Rd  Ocala, Florida 34471




Foot & Ankle Center of Ocala


6160 Sw Hwy 200  Ocala, Florida 34476




APPLEWOOD ORTHOPEDICS


2801 Se 1st Ave Ste 101  Ocala, Florida 34471




SUNCOAST PODIATRY ASSOCIATES INC


3301 Sw 34th Cir Ste 102 102 Ste Ocala, Florida 34474





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 


Key Contacts




Christopher  Fleming

Phone: (352) 873-3332 
 



 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM










Services | Fleming, Christopher, MD Jefferson, MD 21755 - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomePhysicians & Surgeons near Jefferson, MDFleming, Christopher, MDServicesFleming, Christopher, MD4014 Mountville Rd, Jefferson, MD 21755(301) 834-7188View Business DetailsServices"Fish and Chips" found in 1 dishPhysicians General PractitionersImmunizationsInsurance Coverage: Sometimes covered by insurance, but often not. In cases where a form is needed a short time after an appointment (i.e., child had an annual Well Child Exam to update immunizations and three months later needs a form filled out for camp), the doctor may be able to complete the form without another visit. However, there is a fee to fill out the form and that fee is usually not covered by insurance.AllergiesWeight ManagementWeight Management and Carb Counting: This class provides education about weight, diets, counting carbs and the role of food in our life.  It also offers information and support for those who are trying to lose weight.Primary CareAt FPCA, we put our patients first. You can take comfort knowing we have the full record of your medical history, allowing us to provide you with efficient and comprehensive medical care. Our nine locations throughout Frederick County have extended weekday and weekend hours for your convenience. As an added benefit, FPCA offers a variety of in-office services to supplement our traditional primary care and we accept most major insurance plans.Smoking CessationEar InfectionsFamily PracticeCome work for Frederick County’s largest and most innovative Family Practice!  We offer competitive salaries and a generous benefit package.Emergency CareWe recommend you consider a walk-in visit before going to the emergency department. FPCA walk-in care can be quicker, with a lower cost and better results, compared to a crowded ER that may require unnecessary tests or hospital stays. Your FPCA provider knows your complete medical history** and may be able to handle non-life threatening illness or injuries, offer you a same or next day appointment, or refer you to another provider.Flu ShotsElectrocardiogramSpecialized planning visit to review which Medicare preventive services you need. Medicare requires that a standard set of questions be asked. They must include: review of functional status, depression screening, list of special medical equipment (if any), and list of other doctors. At the end of the visit, you receive a written summary of the services you require that are covered by Medicare. These might include cancer screening tests, EKG, blood tests, bone density tests, ultrasound, etc.RadiologistUltrasoundDermatologistsBurnsRashesEndocrinologistDiabetes CarePhysical TherapistsSports MedicineThese sports physicals can be completed during your child’s annual well child visit. The vast majority of insurance companies cover well child checks 100% with no co-payment or deductible, so there should be no cost for the sports physical if it is done as part of regular preventive care.*Physical TherapyFPCA Physical Therapy Group examines, diagnoses and treats conditions that limit the body’s ability to function. The therapist will develop a plan of care of each individual patient that will help to restore function, reduce pain and prevent future disability. We will provide patients with a detailed home exercise program to assist in speeding recovery.PsychiatristsDepressionSend to PhoneFleming, Christopher, MD4014 Mountville Rd, Jefferson, MD 21755(301) 834-7188Send this business listing as a text message to a mobile phone.I agree to the Terms and ConditionsCancelSendYour text message was sent.To opt out at anytime, send the word STOP to YP411.To get a help message, send the word HELP to YP411.There was an error sending your text.Please try again.E-MailFleming, Christopher, MD4014 Mountville Rd, Jefferson, MD 21755(301) 834-7188Send this business details to yourself or up to 5 friends.Up to 5 email addresses, separate addresses with a commaSend Yourself a CopyCancelSend 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback



Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Christopher Scott Fleming in Canton, GA (Import & export history)
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Christopher Scott Fleming, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Christopher Scott Fleming

Christopher Scott Fleming imports from Vck Rotterdam Bv As Forwarding in Netherlands through the port of Savannah, Georgia        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Christopher Scott Fleming and millions of other importers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 PING INC.
 DELL PRODUCTS
 NINTENDO OF AMERICA INC.
 HOT TOPIC MERCHANDISE INC.
 BOEING SUPPORT SERVICES
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Christopher Scott Fleming
Christopher Scott Fleming imports from Vck Rotterdam Bv As Forwarding in Netherlands through the port of Savannah, Georgia


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



VCK ROTTERDAM BV AS FORWARDING
AGENTS ONLY FOR:OMNI SHIPPING      
SERVICES, INC.C/O TEAM ALLIED BV   
SEVILLAWEG 20 3047 AL ROTTERDAM    
THE NETHERLANDS ON BEHALF OF:


CHRISTOPHER SCOTT FLEMING
104 GOLD SPRINGS COURT             
CANTON, GA 30114                   
PH: +1 678 4935404                 
DATE OF BIRTH: 09-NOV-1967



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



STEVENS INTERNATIONALOVERSEAS SHIPPERS ASSOCIATION




ORIG 
DE S 
LOHM 
1181 
VEEN 
THE
ORIG 
DE S 
LOHM 
1181 
VEEN 
THE





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number






GATU8134480
GATU8134480


Product Description




USED HOUSEHOLD GOODSOF USED HOUSEHOLD GOODSOWNER:CHRISTOPHER SCOTT FLEMINGDATE OF BIRTH:9 NOV.1967PASSPORT:0267948101 USA
USED HOUSEHOLD GOODSOF USED HOUSEHOLD GOODSOWNER:CHRISTOPHER SCOTT FLEMINGDATE OF BIRTH:9 NOV.1967PASSPORT:0267948101 USA









Bill of LadingHLCURTM090607708Arrival Date2009-07-06Weight (LB)13,999Weight (KG)6,363Quantity318 PCSContainer Count1Voyage No.79W25Port of LoadingROTTERDAMPort of DischargeSAVANNAH, GEORGIAVessel NameESSEN EXPRESSCarrier CodeHLCUCountry Of OriginNetherlandsPlace Of ReceiptROTTERDAM, NL 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Christopher Scott Fleming. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Christopher Scott Fleming has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Christopher Scott Fleming







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Christopher Scott Fleming
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Caffco Intl Ltd (phils)                                



                                    Beutler Port Service Gbmh, Bps                                



                                    Stnaley A Canton                                



                                    Microbiologique Inc                                



                                    Drechslerei Mutter & Sohn                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.2347
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X

















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started











































product – Chris Fleming





































Skip to content



Chris Fleming
Product, policy, data, capability

Menu










Tag: product 


Intranet iterations 

We’ve been doing some more work on our intranet. Here’s a rundown of our latest release and some final thoughts on what I’ve learnt working on this product.
Why take a digital approach to an intranet?
I’ve said in previous posts that intranets can be the scorn of digital purists. “Why not just have a wiki and a blog – it’s totally free?” they cry. Well, maybe.
But as this is my last intranet sprint (sprintranet?) I wanted to make the case for taking a digital approach to this ever present departmental tool. I think there are 4 compelling reasons.

Improved experience for users. The obvious one. Civil servants are users too, and saving them time and effort with products that work is better for them, and better for taxpayers.
It’s a means of spreading digital culture and techniques widely across the department. Talking to lots of teams in the department about their intranet content or involving them in user research has enabled me to introduce principles of agile and user-centred design to lots of people who otherwise would never have encountered these techniques. A good thing in the wider scheme of digital transformation.
Getting content design more widely understood. I’m increasingly convinced that content design training should join information security and unconscious bias as mandatory for policy civil servants. Until that happens, working with teams on their intranet content is a decent alternative.
It’s a good training ground. A staff intranet is a reasonably low stakes environment, which makes it ideal for practising agile techniques, user testing and the like. Particularly as uses are on your door step. Four different fast streamers have now participated in running guerrilla testing or pop up labs in the department, and done brilliantly at it.

On to the highlights of our latest release. As ever, if anyone is interested in playing around with the intranet WordPress theme, it’s available on Github. All comments and thoughts welcomed.
Homepage
In our last intranet post we talked about the changes to the homepage design. The changes have attracted a lot of great comments. But more importantly our ongoing testing is showing users are completing popular tasks more easily.
Of course not everything is working perfectly, so we are continuing to tweak and improve. For instance we found users were not noticing when new content was being posted in the campaign box. So we introduced a ‘new’ banner to signal this event.

Information architecture
Our ongoing user research has repeatedly surfaced pain points for users navigating the site. Users did not always understand the main section headings, or what topics might be listed underneath.
To test further we ran several card sorting sessions to try and come up with better labels and a more intuitive architecture. Despite plenty of hard work, it turned out we couldn’t. Naming and sorting things into categories is just one of those timeless problems. We ended up agreeing that what we had was probably the least worst option.
To attack the problem from another angle we introduced some new functionality. We implemented the brilliantly named Accessible Mega Menu. This now provides a drop down of topics that appears underneath a section heading, to help users see what is available and help them answer their questions more quickly.

Events
The department puts on a wide range of events.  By making use of theEventbrite API, our intranet administrators are able to create and manage events using all the functionality of Eventbrite. Once published, the event details are pulled automatically into the relevant intranet pages. Along with some design tweaks, we’ve made an already excellent events booking process even better.

Our next sprint will be later in the year. Look out for further updates from a new product manager then.  And a final word of good luck and thanks to the brilliant team. My laptop will continue to wear our mission patch with pride.
This post was originally published on the Digital Health blog.
 




10 things policy can learn from product 


Six months ago I made a career pivot from policy making to product management. The roles require a similar mix of empathy and politics, so I feel I’ve taken to it reasonably well. Alongside a deep understanding of Internet-enabled technologies, a notable difference is how much and how effectively product management makes use of specific tools and methodologies to solve problems.
So here are ten techniques I would bring into a policy team if I went back. If any of the terms don’t make sense, Ben Stevens from the Home Office has posted a handy glossary.

Work in sprints. Choose a time period of 1 or 2 weeks to help give structure to the team’s work. Get everyone together at the start of the sprint and agree the things you are going to focus on completing in that time, remembering that new tasks will come in too. This is called sprint planning.
Hold ‘stand-ups’ over the course of the sprint, and ‘retrospectives’, and ‘show and tells’ at the end of it. Don’t be spooked by the language. These are just meetings, so not exactly an alien concept to policy makers. There’s no need for me to repeat better guidance elsewhere on this, except to endorse how useful they are as an ensemble.
Get a wall. Every team needs a wall. I managed a major house renovation last year and even had a wall (this is not a joke). At its simplest this is expressing a task on a Post-It note, fixing it to a nice flat surface that people can gather around, and moving the tasks through columns labelled ‘doing next’, ‘doing now’, and ‘done’. Do this, and then feel the energy and sense of achievement coursing through the team as they deposit card after card in the done column at each stand-up.
Create genuinely multidisciplinary teams. I spent some time shadowing my mentor who works on NHS.UK Alpha a few weeks ago. It’s a full-blown agile team, replete with product manager, delivery manger, content writers, designers, and developers. Having such expertise around a table enabled them to do magical things, like designing the key features of a GP look-up service, in record time. My experience of policy is usually hierarchical group of something akin to project managers. Other experts tend to be in a box somewhere, wheeled out for special occasions. It also now seems amazing to me that design thinking in policy is still seen as the cutting edge while it’s de rigeur in digital.
Make it someone’s explicit responsibility to knit the team. The mantra goes, “the unit of delivery is the team”, and commensurate effort is placed in getting that team working brilliantly together. My experience working in policy teams is that if they are working great, then great. But if they are not, the response is usually a shrug and sporadic suggestions for ‘more social events’. Digital methodology encourages constant communication between the team using stand-ups. It celebrates successes through show+tells, and does a thorough job of learning from failures through retrospectives. The result is a team completely aligned around an objective, with everyone feeling they are part of something important, and fantastic pace of delivery. Tasks fall to the team not individuals. This reduces risk of single point of failure.
Separate responsibility for day-to-day delivery with big picture and vision. In digital there are overlapping and complementary roles called product manager and delivery manager. The former focusses on macro issues: vision, roadmap, stakeholder management. The other focusses on micro issues: unblocking the obstacles the team faces day-to-day, and doing the team coaching I describe above. This structure recognises something important about our minds being poor at doing two things at the same time. It’s very effective.
Try out some new collaborative tools. Digital teams more naturally have their fingers on the pulse of internet-enabled tools to facilitate team communication, prioritisation, or collaboration. I know IT systems can create barriers to this; but in an age where everyone has a smart phone it’s not hard to find workarounds. If you had to pick any, for me it is Slack. There’s a bit of a backlash against Slack at the moment (Slacklash?), but frankly I’m still at the crest of the wave of appreciation that sees how much more efficient than email is at enabling team interaction.
Prioritise properly. Product recognises you can’t do everything, so have a plethora of techniques for deciding what comes next. Do a few things well rather than lots of things mediocrely, and be rigorous in your approach to choosing which those things should be.
Clap more. Digital teams religiously clap their teammate’s or others’ presentations. This is not only courteous, but sends the presenter away with those few extra endorphins that make it all seem worth it.
Be agile. Note the small ‘a’. My simplest interpretation of this is understanding that for almost everything, your first answer could well be wrong. Doing something and then testing it is better than trying to get it perfect first time. As long as it is labelled as such, it is fine to say something is a prototype or early version and will be iterated, improved, or even binned.

None of these suggestions are especially complicated. But they can be tough to implement in teams unfamiliar with the language and culture. Digital teams should help with this where they can, as forming good habits should not solely be the preserve of digital. They should be for everyone.
I’d be delighted to give my novice advice to any policy makers, so do get in touch if it would help. Hat tips to Lisa, Matt, and Kylie for product coaching, andBenji for delivery management advice.
 
 




An agile intranet 


We designed our intranet to be continuously improved, and over recent weeks have been doing just that. Since the intranet’s launch last year we have gathered data and done extensive research to deepen our insights into our users’ behaviour. This is enabling us to flex our product to meet our users’ changing needs – in line with digital best practice.
In our most recent development sprint, we focussed on the homepage. The intranet homepage is the first thing most people in the department see when they log on in the morning, so it’s not surprising that 99.9% of user journeys begin there. That’s not true of all websites – GOV.UK pages are often reached via a search engine – but our default makes the homepage a prime piece of digital real estate. It deserves excellent design and only the most important content or features.
From looking at site traffic we could see the content users visited most over the past year. For instance: guidance on performance management, expenses claims, booking video conferencing, and a few specific  forms. Over the last month or so, content about the DH2020 change programme has also been very popular.
This data informed our qualitative research. We interviewed twenty-one individuals, asking them about their use of the intranet. We also observed them using the homepage to try and perform particular tasks. As well as interviews, we ran card sorting exercises and a co-design workshop where users drew sketches of their ideal homepages, or voted on features they liked from other government intranets. The range of ideas generated ranged from the pragmatic to the extravagant. But the discussion was invaluable in helping our suppliers understand the needs of DH staff. Over two weeks our experts translated those insights into some of the changes you can now see:

Bringing in common design patterns by integrating the menu, search and login into the header to help users find them
Developing prominent areas for links to popular services and pages; these are customisable by our content team so can change as needs change
Introducing a campaign box to highlight the most important ‘need-to-know’ information of the moment
Increasing the number of news stories further down the page; as the large number of users felt the stories dropped off the homepage too quickly
Retaining a clean design that users responded to well, but binning the bits that users did not need or want anymore

Communicating via Slack across several UK locations, the team deployed the changes early last Tuesday morning. Thanks to the brilliant work of the developers we encountered almost no bugs, and by the time we got into the office some fantastic feedback had started to come in.
Launching is the start of a process, not the end. We’re moving straight into more user testing, including those using assistive technologies, to ensure our changes are performing as we want.
An ‘agile intranet’ is something the department should be proud of. Internal services and tools are rarely built in this way. It has only been possible for us to effect improvements to this product quickly, cheaply, and securely thanks to our predecessors. They left us a site built on open source software, to open standards, with no contract lock-in, and with the precedent set for relentless focus on user needs. Long may that continue.
Originally posted to Digital Health Blog.
 








Search for:


Search

  Recent Posts 

Intranet iterations


Bridging the digital language divide


Just one more time, what is digital again?


10 things policy can learn from product


An agile intranet


 Recent CommentsArchives 
June 2016
April 2016
March 2016
February 2016
November 2015

 











